dict-sa-Deva/sa-Deva.aff
FLAG NUM
SFX 4888 Y 1
SFX 4888 0 त्मन् .
SFX 681 Y 1
SFX 681 0 एः .
SFX 1119 Y 1
SFX 1119 0 अन्त्योः .
SFX 2386 Y 1
SFX 2386 0 टः .
SFX 4310 Y 1
SFX 4310 0 क्ते .
SFX 4055 Y 1
SFX 4055 0 र्मणा .
SFX 4990 Y 1
SFX 4990 0 र्मणी .
SFX 1589 Y 1
SFX 1589 0 आणस्य .
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 0 नयोः .
SFX 3243 Y 1
SFX 3243 0 कृताय .
SFX 787 Y 1
SFX 787 0 नीयाभ्याम् .
SFX 1924 Y 1
SFX 1924 0 तास्वः .
SFX 2339 Y 1
SFX 2339 0 करम् .
SFX 2368 Y 1
SFX 2368 0 करौ .
SFX 2933 Y 1
SFX 2933 0 र्योः .
SFX 2153 Y 1
SFX 2153 0 यमाणासु .
SFX 4384 Y 1
SFX 4384 0 रहस्य .
SFX 4908 Y 1
SFX 4908 0 रहस्ये .
SFX 2713 Y 1
SFX 2713 0 अणीयेषु .
SFX 1313 Y 1
SFX 1313 0 तिभ्यः .
SFX 3944 Y 1
SFX 3944 0 ङ्गम् .
SFX 4194 Y 1
SFX 4194 0 ङ्गौ .
SFX 2150 Y 1
SFX 2150 0 यमाणायै .
SFX 2425 Y 1
SFX 2425 0 सा .
SFX 3820 Y 1
SFX 3820 0 सी .
SFX 532 Y 1
SFX 532 0 यस्व .
SFX 4703 Y 1
SFX 4703 0 र्थानाम् .
SFX 1247 Y 1
SFX 1247 0 इतव्यतः .
SFX 3306 Y 1
SFX 3306 0 क्ष .
SFX 3348 Y 1
SFX 3348 0 क्षे .
SFX 4547 Y 1
SFX 4547 0 पालेषु .
SFX 4531 Y 1
SFX 4531 0 दत्ताभ्याम् .
SFX 1909 Y 1
SFX 1909 0 तव्यया .
SFX 652 Y 1
SFX 652 0 व्ययोः .
SFX 1613 Y 1
SFX 1613 0 यद्भ्यः .
SFX 1145 Y 1
SFX 1145 0 एत् .
SFX 2063 Y 1
SFX 2063 0 तं .
SFX 3193 Y 1
SFX 3193 0 कृत्सु .
SFX 3955 Y 1
SFX 3955 0 वादयोः .
SFX 1868 Y 1
SFX 1868 0 यितव्येभ्यः .
SFX 2694 Y 1
SFX 2694 0 अयावहे .
SFX 1611 Y 1
SFX 1611 0 लाः .
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 मानैः .
SFX 4597 Y 1
SFX 4597 0 तकैः .
SFX 951 Y 1
SFX 951 0 माणाभ्यः .
SFX 587 Y 1
SFX 587 0 इताय .
SFX 1216 Y 1
SFX 1216 0 इताभ्यः .
SFX 4898 Y 1
SFX 4898 0 स्थानाभ्याम् .
SFX 4266 Y 1
SFX 4266 0 न्तेभ्यः .
SFX 3870 Y 1
SFX 3870 0 दीपिकायाः .
SFX 1963 Y 1
SFX 1963 0 यितव्यायाः .
SFX 4165 Y 1
SFX 4165 0 पेन .
SFX 2738 Y 1
SFX 2738 0 विधे .
SFX 2681 Y 1
SFX 2681 0 विधि .
SFX 1369 Y 1
SFX 1369 0 तवद्भ्याम् .
SFX 3973 Y 1
SFX 3973 0 कर्म्णी .
SFX 1597 Y 1
SFX 1597 0 णाः .
SFX 4554 Y 1
SFX 4554 0 धः .
SFX 3057 Y 1
SFX 3057 0 श्वरम् .
SFX 3436 Y 1
SFX 3436 0 श्वरौ .
SFX 2310 Y 1
SFX 2310 0 दैः .
SFX 1916 Y 1
SFX 1916 0 अकः .
SFX 926 Y 1
SFX 926 0 अनैः .
SFX 2614 Y 1
SFX 2614 0 अयिष्यावहे .
SFX 2753 Y 1
SFX 2753 0 हतः .
SFX 1672 Y 1
SFX 1672 0 तव्यस्य .
SFX 2073 Y 1
SFX 2073 0 णीषु .
SFX 4517 Y 1
SFX 4517 0 ल्याम् .
SFX 3364 Y 1
SFX 3364 0 देवेन .
SFX 2534 Y 1
SFX 2534 0 अयथ .
SFX 3694 Y 1
SFX 3694 0 क्षैः .
SFX 2436 Y 1
SFX 2436 0 इकयोः .
SFX 1483 Y 1
SFX 1483 0 इष्यमाणेभ्यः .
SFX 1140 Y 1
SFX 1140 0 अध्वे .
SFX 1164 Y 1
SFX 1164 0 ईयायाम् .
SFX 2603 Y 1
SFX 2603 0 अयध्वम् .
SFX 4449 Y 1
SFX 4449 0 लक्षणस्य .
SFX 2483 Y 1
SFX 2483 0 अयितास्वः .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 याः .
SFX 1264 Y 1
SFX 1264 0 आवहे .
SFX 4331 Y 1
SFX 4331 0 ध .
SFX 3230 Y 1
SFX 3230 0 धे .
SFX 3682 Y 1
SFX 3682 0 धि .
SFX 1468 Y 1
SFX 1468 0 इष्यमाणायाः .
SFX 4656 Y 1
SFX 4656 0 भाष्येभ्यः .
SFX 4669 Y 1
SFX 4669 0 अतीभिः .
SFX 157 Y 1
SFX 157 0 तयोः .
SFX 4706 Y 1
SFX 4706 0 प्रियाः .
SFX 1403 Y 1
SFX 1403 0 इष्यामि .
SFX 4901 Y 1
SFX 4901 0 रसयोः .
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 0 भावान् .
SFX 2783 Y 1
SFX 2783 0 भावात् .
SFX 3884 Y 1
SFX 3884 0 प्रकाशाय .
SFX 501 Y 1
SFX 501 0 त्वाय .
SFX 4249 Y 1
SFX 4249 0 लया .
SFX 671 Y 1
SFX 671 0 तानि .
SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105 0 तीः .
SFX 2092 Y 1
SFX 2092 0 ष्यन्त्यै .
SFX 2090 Y 1
SFX 2090 0 ष्यन्त्यौ .
SFX 1212 Y 1
SFX 1212 0 इतायै .
SFX 1283 Y 1
SFX 1283 0 इतव्यायै .
SFX 1902 Y 1
SFX 1902 0 तव्याम् .
SFX 1704 Y 1
SFX 1704 0 तव्यान् .
SFX 1671 Y 1
SFX 1671 0 तव्यात् .
SFX 1783 Y 1
SFX 1783 0 अकम् .
SFX 1900 Y 1
SFX 1900 0 अकौ .
SFX 342 Y 1
SFX 342 0 मानेभ्यः .
SFX 4114 Y 1
SFX 4114 0 णां .
SFX 3295 Y 1
SFX 3295 0 कर्मणोः .
SFX 2573 Y 1
SFX 2573 0 अयिष्यद्भ्याम् .
SFX 4853 Y 1
SFX 4853 0 रेः .
SFX 3332 Y 1
SFX 3332 0 कृततः .
SFX 1195 Y 1
SFX 1195 0 अनीय .
SFX 1201 Y 1
SFX 1201 0 अनीये .
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 आनायाम् .
SFX 1161 Y 1
SFX 1161 0 एयम् .
SFX 4894 Y 1
SFX 4894 0 स्थानाय .
SFX 4319 Y 1
SFX 4319 0 टानि .
SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 0 कतः .
SFX 1350 Y 1
SFX 1350 0 इष्यन्त्योः .
SFX 4430 Y 1
SFX 4430 0 अयाणाम् .
SFX 4855 Y 1
SFX 4855 0 रसः .
SFX 1493 Y 1
SFX 1493 0 इष्यमाणः .
SFX 3289 Y 1
SFX 3289 0 फलस्य .
SFX 4292 Y 1
SFX 4292 0 लक्षणाभ्याम् .
SFX 4862 Y 1
SFX 4862 0 ज्ञतः .
SFX 591 Y 1
SFX 591 0 आना .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 मानायाः .
SFX 3718 Y 1
SFX 3718 0 भूतेभ्यः .
SFX 2280 Y 1
SFX 2280 0 अयित्वा .
SFX 4689 Y 1
SFX 4689 0 ज्ञाभ्याम् .
SFX 3093 Y 1
SFX 3093 0 रा .
SFX 2452 Y 1
SFX 2452 0 री .
SFX 3592 Y 1
SFX 3592 0 सङ्ग्रहम् .
SFX 3586 Y 1
SFX 3586 0 सङ्ग्रहौ .
SFX 4730 Y 1
SFX 4730 0 रूपेषु .
SFX 2718 Y 1
SFX 2718 0 अणीयाय .
SFX 3214 Y 1
SFX 3214 0 तरेषु .
SFX 3168 Y 1
SFX 3168 0 अमाणेन .
SFX 3183 Y 1
SFX 3183 0 अमाणाभ्याम् .
SFX 4497 Y 1
SFX 4497 0 तकाय .
SFX 1082 Y 1
SFX 1082 0 अध्वम् .
SFX 3515 Y 1
SFX 3515 0 स्तोत्राय .
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 0 अत्सु .
SFX 649 Y 1
SFX 649 0 यया .
SFX 3799 Y 1
SFX 3799 0 यां .
SFX 1833 Y 1
SFX 1833 0 णीयैः .
SFX 2876 Y 1
SFX 2876 0 ग .
SFX 3032 Y 1
SFX 3032 0 गे .
SFX 1509 Y 1
SFX 1509 0 इतवत्योः .
SFX 1580 Y 1
SFX 1580 0 लस्य .
SFX 1792 Y 1
SFX 1792 0 मययोः .
SFX 3950 Y 1
SFX 3950 0 घ्नः .
SFX 4915 Y 1
SFX 4915 0 रहस्यैः .
SFX 4784 Y 1
SFX 4784 0 ष्टेन .
SFX 402 Y 1
SFX 402 0 नाय .
SFX 1199 Y 1
SFX 1199 0 अनीयेन .
SFX 680 Y 1
SFX 680 0 नतः .
SFX 2976 Y 1
SFX 2976 0 विधीनाम् .
SFX 1834 Y 1
SFX 1834 0 यिता .
SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 0 केषु .
SFX 4247 Y 1
SFX 4247 0 लायै .
SFX 2729 Y 1
SFX 2729 0 अणीयाभ्याम् .
SFX 4411 Y 1
SFX 4411 0 वनात् .
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 0 थाः .
SFX 4346 Y 1
SFX 4346 0 पदैः .
SFX 2001 Y 1
SFX 2001 0 यिष्यन्तम् .
SFX 2000 Y 1
SFX 2000 0 यिष्यन्तौ .
SFX 1291 Y 1
SFX 1291 0 एयाताम् .
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 0 वन्ति .
SFX 3536 Y 1
SFX 3536 0 थयोः .
SFX 783 Y 1
SFX 783 0 यमानाभिः .
SFX 666 Y 1
SFX 666 0 व्यतः .
SFX 1793 Y 1
SFX 1793 0 मयाय .
SFX 2114 Y 1
SFX 2114 0 यमाणयोः .
SFX 923 Y 1
SFX 923 0 अनेन .
SFX 2039 Y 1
SFX 2039 0 यिष्यमाणासु .
SFX 2390 Y 1
SFX 2390 0 अयितव्येन .
SFX 4830 Y 1
SFX 4830 0 निभ्याम् .
SFX 1614 Y 1
SFX 1614 0 यद्भिः .
SFX 695 Y 1
SFX 695 0 णानाम् .
SFX 4227 Y 1
SFX 4227 0 णायै .
SFX 3958 Y 1
SFX 3958 0 वादतः .
SFX 373 Y 1
SFX 373 0 यस्य .
SFX 3646 Y 1
SFX 3646 0 मना .
SFX 2737 Y 1
SFX 2737 0 अयामहे .
SFX 4526 Y 1
SFX 4526 0 गेन .
SFX 4380 Y 1
SFX 4380 0 टाभिः .
SFX 2355 Y 1
SFX 2355 0 करेभ्यः .
SFX 653 Y 1
SFX 653 0 व्याभ्याम् .
SFX 1971 Y 1
SFX 1971 0 यिष्यामि .
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 ह .
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81 0 हे .
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 हि .
SFX 4543 Y 1
SFX 4543 0 रीम् .
SFX 577 Y 1
SFX 577 0 इतयोः .
SFX 3940 Y 1
SFX 3940 0 ङ्गेभ्यः .
SFX 2273 Y 1
SFX 2273 0 शैः .
SFX 1836 Y 1
SFX 1836 0 जाभ्याम् .
SFX 4457 Y 1
SFX 4457 0 अवद्भ्याम् .
SFX 1465 Y 1
SFX 1465 0 इष्यमाणयोः .
SFX 2649 Y 1
SFX 2649 0 अयिष्यामहे .
SFX 1898 Y 1
SFX 1898 0 जः .
SFX 1319 Y 1
SFX 1319 0 तिषु .
SFX 4863 Y 1
SFX 4863 0 ज्ञान् .
SFX 4747 Y 1
SFX 4747 0 ज्ञात् .
SFX 1449 Y 1
SFX 1449 0 इतवताम् .
SFX 1968 Y 1
SFX 1968 0 यितव्याभ्यः .
SFX 648 Y 1
SFX 648 0 यायै .
SFX 1287 Y 1
SFX 1287 0 इतव्याम् .
SFX 1248 Y 1
SFX 1248 0 इतव्यान् .
SFX 1234 Y 1
SFX 1234 0 इतव्यात् .
SFX 574 Y 1
SFX 574 0 इत .
SFX 575 Y 1
SFX 575 0 इते .
SFX 4422 Y 1
SFX 4422 0 इति .
SFX 3079 Y 1
SFX 3079 0 तीर्थम् .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 ओः .
SFX 4548 Y 1
SFX 4548 0 पालेन .
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 0 षः .
SFX 1922 Y 1
SFX 1922 0 इत्वा .
SFX 2739 Y 1
SFX 2739 0 विधौ .
SFX 1156 Y 1
SFX 1156 0 आवः .
SFX 2688 Y 1
SFX 2688 0 अणस्य .
SFX 2061 Y 1
SFX 2061 0 यिष्ये .
SFX 3297 Y 1
SFX 3297 0 कर्मणा .
SFX 3974 Y 1
SFX 3974 0 कर्मणी .
SFX 1516 Y 1
SFX 1516 0 इतवतीषु .
SFX 1236 Y 1
SFX 1236 0 इतव्यानाम् .
SFX 3153 Y 1
SFX 3153 0 अतीनाम् .
SFX 515 Y 1
SFX 515 0 येत .
SFX 537 Y 1
SFX 537 0 येते .
SFX 4779 Y 1
SFX 4779 0 वृत्तीः .
SFX 4060 Y 1
SFX 4060 0 रणेन .
SFX 3964 Y 1
SFX 3964 0 वादाभ्याम् .
SFX 3200 Y 1
SFX 3200 0 अमाणायाम् .
SFX 1185 Y 1
SFX 1185 0 आमहे .
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 ततः .
SFX 556 Y 1
SFX 556 0 आनेभ्यः .
SFX 2087 Y 1
SFX 2087 0 ष्यथ .
SFX 3046 Y 1
SFX 3046 0 हेभ्यः .
SFX 2135 Y 1
SFX 2135 0 णीया .
SFX 3627 Y 1
SFX 3627 0 व्रतात् .
SFX 4515 Y 1
SFX 4515 0 मालाः .
SFX 3363 Y 1
SFX 3363 0 देवेषु .
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 0 आभ्यः .
SFX 2029 Y 1
SFX 2029 0 यिष्यमाणयोः .
SFX 4925 Y 1
SFX 4925 0 इ .
SFX 2084 Y 1
SFX 2084 0 इम् .
SFX 1942 Y 1
SFX 1942 0 इन् .
SFX 3909 Y 1
SFX 3909 0 स्थाभ्याम् .
SFX 542 Y 1
SFX 542 0 यावहै .
SFX 599 Y 1
SFX 599 0 आनायाः .
SFX 1187 Y 1
SFX 1187 0 एम .
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 0 मानम् .
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 0 मानौ .
SFX 1489 Y 1
SFX 1489 0 इष्यमाणानि .
SFX 1752 Y 1
SFX 1752 0 येतम् .
SFX 4119 Y 1
SFX 4119 0 भयोः .
SFX 2467 Y 1
SFX 2467 0 अयितुम् .
SFX 4264 Y 1
SFX 4264 0 न्तेषु .
SFX 1263 Y 1
SFX 1263 0 नीषु .
SFX 3552 Y 1
SFX 3552 0 पुराय .
SFX 487 Y 1
SFX 487 0 त्वेन .
SFX 1899 Y 1
SFX 1899 0 तव्या .
SFX 4216 Y 1
SFX 4216 0 अवान् .
SFX 3045 Y 1
SFX 3045 0 इकाभिः .
SFX 1512 Y 1
SFX 1512 0 इतवत्यै .
SFX 1510 Y 1
SFX 1510 0 इतवत्यौ .
SFX 2879 Y 1
SFX 2879 0 मेभ्यः .
SFX 3319 Y 1
SFX 3319 0 हानाम् .
SFX 3541 Y 1
SFX 3541 0 पुरयोः .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 वत्योः .
SFX 1954 Y 1
SFX 1954 0 यितास्थः .
SFX 3618 Y 1
SFX 3618 0 करणानाम् .
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 ताभ्याम् .
SFX 1621 Y 1
SFX 1621 0 अमानेन .
SFX 3405 Y 1
SFX 3405 0 पद्धते .
SFX 2888 Y 1
SFX 2888 0 पद्धति .
SFX 1766 Y 1
SFX 1766 0 मयतः .
SFX 3400 Y 1
SFX 3400 0 पद्धतिभ्याम् .
SFX 4654 Y 1
SFX 4654 0 भाष्येषु .
SFX 3943 Y 1
SFX 3943 0 ङ्गस्य .
SFX 2053 Y 1
SFX 2053 0 ष्ये .
SFX 1956 Y 1
SFX 1956 0 यितासि .
SFX 3250 Y 1
SFX 3250 0 काराय .
SFX 2990 Y 1
SFX 2990 0 सारः .
SFX 3921 Y 1
SFX 3921 0 भ .
SFX 3855 Y 1
SFX 3855 0 भे .
SFX 4028 Y 1
SFX 4028 0 पुत्रान् .
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 0 पुत्रात् .
SFX 3597 Y 1
SFX 3597 0 सङ्ग्रह .
SFX 3583 Y 1
SFX 3583 0 सङ्ग्रहे .
SFX 2943 Y 1
SFX 2943 0 अणीया .
SFX 1346 Y 1
SFX 1346 0 इष्यावः .
SFX 4979 Y 1
SFX 4979 0 अत्व .
SFX 3584 Y 1
SFX 3584 0 सङ्ग्रहयोः .
SFX 2775 Y 1
SFX 2775 0 भावयोः .
SFX 1491 Y 1
SFX 1491 0 इष्यमाणम् .
SFX 1485 Y 1
SFX 1485 0 इष्यमाणौ .
SFX 3285 Y 1
SFX 3285 0 फलेन .
SFX 3341 Y 1
SFX 3341 0 मुखस्य .
SFX 1718 Y 1
SFX 1718 0 ज .
SFX 1708 Y 1
SFX 1708 0 जे .
SFX 1342 Y 1
SFX 1342 0 इष्यन् .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 इष्यत् .
SFX 2695 Y 1
SFX 2695 0 अयावहै .
SFX 4637 Y 1
SFX 4637 0 कल्पाः .
SFX 3842 Y 1
SFX 3842 0 तरान् .
SFX 3235 Y 1
SFX 3235 0 तरात् .
SFX 370 Y 1
SFX 370 0 एन .
SFX 3375 Y 1
SFX 3375 0 उखेषु .
SFX 3970 Y 1
SFX 3970 0 पुत्रस्य .
SFX 4659 Y 1
SFX 4659 0 भाष्याय .
SFX 3922 Y 1
SFX 3922 0 थतः .
SFX 2655 Y 1
SFX 2655 0 पतिषु .
SFX 3368 Y 1
SFX 3368 0 देवस्य .
SFX 2117 Y 1
SFX 2117 0 यमाणतः .
SFX 4869 Y 1
SFX 4869 0 भृत्सु .
SFX 3137 Y 1
SFX 3137 0 इव .
SFX 1744 Y 1
SFX 1744 0 अयाः .
SFX 2365 Y 1
SFX 2365 0 टेषु .
SFX 4567 Y 1
SFX 4567 0 प्रिययोः .
SFX 1870 Y 1
SFX 1870 0 यितव्ययोः .
SFX 347 Y 1
SFX 347 0 याभ्याम् .
SFX 3226 Y 1
SFX 3226 0 कृतानाम् .
SFX 1698 Y 1
SFX 1698 0 यन्तीभ्याम् .
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 कानाम् .
SFX 1092 Y 1
SFX 1092 0 रेभ्यः .
SFX 4188 Y 1
SFX 4188 0 रायाः .
SFX 4519 Y 1
SFX 4519 0 जानि .
SFX 4316 Y 1
SFX 4316 0 आला .
SFX 4102 Y 1
SFX 4102 0 सूत्रात् .
SFX 4688 Y 1
SFX 4688 0 ज्ञानाम् .
SFX 3310 Y 1
SFX 3310 0 गैः .
SFX 4218 Y 1
SFX 4218 0 अतीः .
SFX 2543 Y 1
SFX 2543 0 अयिष्यत्सु .
SFX 4631 Y 1
SFX 4631 0 पालः .
SFX 2115 Y 1
SFX 2115 0 यमाणाय .
SFX 2333 Y 1
SFX 2333 0 अनः .
SFX 2143 Y 1
SFX 2143 0 णीयाभ्यः .
SFX 3834 Y 1
SFX 3834 0 वृत्तिषु .
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 0 आनया .
SFX 1742 Y 1
SFX 1742 0 येव .
SFX 610 Y 1
SFX 610 0 इततः .
SFX 2685 Y 1
SFX 2685 0 अणेभ्यः .
SFX 3305 Y 1
SFX 3305 0 तन्त्र .
SFX 3566 Y 1
SFX 3566 0 तन्त्रे .
SFX 3571 Y 1
SFX 3571 0 तन्त्राणाम् .
SFX 643 Y 1
SFX 643 0 याभ्यः .
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 तीषु .
SFX 1486 Y 1
SFX 1486 0 इष्यमाणतः .
SFX 3521 Y 1
SFX 3521 0 स्तोत्राभ्याम् .
SFX 1301 Y 1
SFX 1301 0 इतास्मः .
SFX 2500 Y 1
SFX 2500 0 अयितव्याभिः .
SFX 4717 Y 1
SFX 4717 0 कल्पान् .
SFX 4685 Y 1
SFX 4685 0 कल्पात् .
SFX 2155 Y 1
SFX 2155 0 यमाणाम् .
SFX 2121 Y 1
SFX 2121 0 यमाणान् .
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 0 यमाणात् .
SFX 4955 Y 1
SFX 4955 0 गताः .
SFX 3551 Y 1
SFX 3551 0 पुरेभ्यः .
SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100 0 णा .
SFX 636 Y 1
SFX 636 0 णी .
SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118 0 क .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 के .
SFX 3769 Y 1
SFX 3769 0 कि .
SFX 602 Y 1
SFX 602 0 अद्भ्याम् .
SFX 2766 Y 1
SFX 2766 0 भावम् .
SFX 2776 Y 1
SFX 2776 0 भावौ .
SFX 4489 Y 1
SFX 4489 0 आलाम् .
